Idaho, session 2025, H0430.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-408. ESTABLISHMENT OF DISTRICTS. (1) There is hereby established
within the state of Idaho seven (7) public health districts more particu-
larly defined as follows:
(a) District No. 1 shall include the counties of Boundary, Bonner,
Kootenai, Benewah, and Shoshone;
(b) District No. 2 shall include the counties of Latah, Clearwater, Nez
Perce, Lewis, and Idaho;
(c) District No. 3 shall include the counties of Adams, Washington,
Payette, Gem, Canyon, and Owyhee;
(d) District No. 4 shall include the counties of Valley, Boise, Ada,
and Elmore;
(e) District No. 5 shall include the counties of Camas, Blaine, Good-
ing, Lincoln, Jerome, Minidoka, Twin Falls, and Cassia;
(f) District No. 6 shall include the counties of Power, Oneida, Ban-
nock, Franklin, Caribou, Bear Lake, Bingham, and Butte; and
(g) District No. 7 shall include the counties of Lemhi, Custer, Clark,
Jefferson, Bonneville, Teton, Madison, and Fremont.
(2) By majority vote of its board of county commissioners, a county may
leave a public health district, in which case the board of county commission-
ers shall assume, within the county, the powers, duties, and responsibil-
ities provided in this chapter or other law to public health districts. A
county that has left a public health district shall not be obligated to pro-
vide funds to such district, to otherwise support such district, or to re-
ceive any funds apportioned to such district.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-424, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-424. COST OF MAINTENANCE OF DISTRICT -- APPORTIONMENT TO MEMBER
COUNTIES. (1) The manner of apportioning the contributions of the counties


as part of the budget of the health district, created pursuant to section
39-423, Idaho Code, shall be as follows:
(1) (a) Seventy percent (70%) of the amount to be contributed by the
counties shall be apportioned among the various counties within the
health district on the basis of population. The proportion of the total
population of each county as compared to the total population of the
health district shall be the proportion by which such county shall share
in the contribution of county funds for the maintenance of the health
district, pursuant to this subsection. The population will be deter-
mined by the last general census when applicable. When a general census
number is not applicable, population shall be estimated for each county
by the state department of commerce and such estimated population num-
ber shall be certified to each health district by not later than April
1.; and
(2) (b) Thirty percent (30%) of the amount to be contributed by the
counties shall be apportioned among the counties within the district
on the basis of taxable market value for assessment purposes. The pro-
portion of the total taxable market value for assessment purposes of
each county as compared to the total taxable market value for assessment
purposes of the health district shall be the proportion by which such
county shall share in the contribution of funds for the maintenance of
the health district, pursuant to this subsection. Total taxable market
value for assessment purposes shall mean the total taxable market value
for assessment purposes as computed by the county assessor for the pre-
ceding full calendar year. Taxable market value for each county shall
be certified to the health districts by the state tax commission for the
preceding year.
(2) A county that has left a public health district pursuant to section
39-408(2), Idaho Code, shall not be apportioned any contributions for such
public health district.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-424A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-424A. ADDITIONAL COUNTY AID TO DISTRICTS -- PROCEDURES. (1) Be-
ginning on January 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, the various boards of
county commissioners shall be responsible for providing additional annual
aid to the public health districts. The amount of such additional county aid
shall not be less than the amount appropriated to the various public health
districts by the legislature for state fiscal year 2021.
(2) The manner of apportioning the additional aid from the various
counties shall be calculated pursuant to section 39-424, Idaho Code, unless
an alternative manner of apportioning the additional aid is agreed to by the
budget committees of the various public health districts.
(3) A county may use any fund balance accruing pursuant to chapter 35,
title 31, Idaho Code, to fund the annual aid provided for in this section.
(4) A county that has left a public health district pursuant to section
39-408(2), Idaho Code, shall not be required to provide aid pursuant to this
section.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.